Nebraska, session 109, LB761.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-2041, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2041 There is hereby created the Integrated Solid Waste
Management Cash Fund. All fees collected by the department pursuant to
this section, fees collected pursuant to subdivision (13)(c) of section
81-1505, or fees designated pursuant to section 13-2042, or money
forfeited under subsection (21) of section 81-1505 shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Forfeited funds may only be
used for purposes specified in the underlying financial assurance
instrument. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
establishing a fee schedule to be paid to the department by persons
applying for a permit to operate a facility pursuant to the Integrated
Solid Waste Management Act or the Environmental Protection Act. Payment
shall be made in full to the department before the application is
processed.
By October 1 of each year, any person holding a permit under the
Integrated Solid Waste Management Act or to operate a solid waste
management facility under the Environmental Protection Act shall pay an
annual fee in an amount to be determined by the council. The annual fee
shall be sufficient to cover the costs of ongoing permit considerations.
The fees collected pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount
necessary to pay reasonable costs of administering the permit program
pursuant to the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act or the
Environmental Protection Act.
Fees collected pursuant to subdivision (13)(c) of section 81-1505
shall be used by the department to implement the rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated pursuant to subsection (13) of section 81-1505.
The State Treasurer shall transfer one million three hundred eighty-four
-2-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
thousand four hundred eighty-four dollars from the Integrated Solid Waste
Management Cash Fund to the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund on or before
June 1, 2006.
Sec. 2. Section 46-606, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
46-606 (1) The department shall collect in advance a registration
fee of two hundred forty dollars and the fee required by subsection (3)
of section 46-1224 for each water well registered under section 46-602
except as provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.
(2) For water wells permitted pursuant to the Industrial Ground
Water Regulatory Act, the department shall collect in advance a
registration fee of two hundred forty dollars and the fee required by
subsection (3) of section 46-1224 for each of the first ten such water
wells registered under section 46-602, and for each group of ten or fewer
such water wells registered thereafter, the department shall collect in
advance a registration fee of two hundred forty dollars and the fee
required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224.
(3) For a series of water wells completed for purposes of
installation of a ground heat exchanger for a structure for utilizing the
geothermal properties of the ground, the department shall collect in
advance a fee of two hundred forty dollars for each such series and the
fee required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224.
(4) For water wells constructed as part of a single site plan for
monitoring ground water, obtaining hydrogeologic information, or
extracting contaminants from the ground, the department shall collect in
advance a registration fee of two hundred forty dollars and the fee
required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224 for each of the first five
such water wells registered under section 46-602, and for each group of
five or fewer such water wells registered thereafter, the department
shall collect in advance a registration fee of two hundred forty dollars
and the fee required by subsection (3) of section 46-1224. However, if
-3-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
such water wells are a part of remedial action approved by the department
pursuant to section 66-1525, 66-1529.02, or 81-15,124, the fee set
pursuant to this subsection shall be collected as if only one water well
was being registered and the fee required by subsection (3) of section
46-1224 shall be collected.
(5)(a) For a series of two or more water wells completed and pumped
into a common carrier as part of a single site plan for irrigation
purposes, the department shall collect in advance a registration fee of
two hundred forty dollars and the fee required by subsection (3) of
section 46-1224 for each of the first two such wells registered under
section 46-602.
(b) Any additional water wells which are part of a series registered
under this subsection shall not be subject to a new well registration
fee.
(6) The department shall remit the fees collected to the State
Treasurer for credit to the appropriate fund. From the registration fees
required by subsections (1) through (5) of this section, the State
Treasurer shall credit to the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment Cash Fund the amount determined by the department to be
necessary to pay for the costs of processing notices filed pursuant to
section 46-230, the costs of water resources update notices required by
section 76-2,124, and the direct and indirect costs to carry out sections
46-602 and 46-1228 costs for making corrections to water well
registration data authorized by subsections (6) and (7) of section 46-602
and shall credit the remainder of the registration fees required by
subsections (1) through (5) of this section to the Water Well
Decommissioning Fund. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees required
by subsection (3) of section 46-1224 to the Water Well Standards and
Contractors' Licensing Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 54-2428, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-4-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
54-2428 (1) Any person required to obtain a National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System permit for an animal feeding operation or a
construction and operating permit for a livestock waste control facility
shall file an application with the department accompanied by the
appropriate fees in the manner established by the department. The
application fee shall be established by the council with a maximum fee of
two hundred dollars. For major modifications to an application or a
permit, the fee shall equal the amount of the application fee.
(2) On or before March 1, 2006, and each year thereafter, each
person who has a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit
or who has a large concentrated animal feeding operation, as defined in
40 C.F.R. 122 and 123, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2004,
and a state operating permit, a construction and operating permit, or a
construction approval issued pursuant to the Environmental Protection Act
or the Livestock Waste Management Act shall pay a per head annual fee
based on the permitted capacity identified in the permit for that
facility. The department shall invoice each permittee by February 1,
2006, and February 1 of each year thereafter.
(3) The initial annual fee shall be: Beef cattle, ten cents per
head; veal calves, ten cents per head; dairy cows, fifteen cents per
head; swine larger than fifty-five pounds or larger, four dollars per one
hundred head or fraction thereof; swine less than fifty-five fifty
pounds, one dollar per one hundred head or fraction thereof; horses,
twenty cents per head; sheep or lambs, one dollar per one hundred head or
fraction thereof; turkeys, two dollars per one thousand head or fraction
thereof; chickens or ducks with liquid manure facility, three dollars per
one thousand head or fraction thereof; and chickens or ducks with other
than liquid manure facility, one dollar per one thousand head or fraction
thereof. This fee structure may be reviewed in fiscal year 2007-08.
(4) The Beginning in fiscal year 2007-08, the department shall
annually review and adjust the fee structure in this section and section
-5-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
54-2423 to ensure that fees are adequate to meet forty twenty percent of
the program costs from the previous fiscal year. All fees collected under
this section and sections 54-2423, 54-2435, and 54-2436 shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Livestock Waste Management Cash
Fund which is created for the purposes described in the Livestock Waste
Management Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Livestock Waste
Management Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall submit
electronically a report to the Legislature in sufficient detail to
document all direct and indirect costs incurred in the previous fiscal
year in carrying out the Livestock Waste Management Act, including the
number of inspections conducted, the number of animal feeding operations
with livestock waste control facilities, the number of animal feeding
operations inspected, the size of the livestock waste control facilities,
the results of water quality monitoring programs, and other elements
relating to carrying out the act. The Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature shall review the report in its analysis of executive programs
in order to verify that the revenue generated from fees was used solely
to offset appropriate and reasonable costs associated with carrying out
the act.
Sec. 4. Section 81-1505, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1505 (1) In order to carry out the purposes of the Environmental
Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, and the
Livestock Waste Management Act, the council shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations which shall set standards of air, water, and land
quality to be applicable to the air, waters, and land of this state or
portions thereof. Such standards of quality shall be such as to protect
-6-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
the public health and welfare. The council shall classify air, water, and
land contaminant sources according to levels and types of discharges,
emissions, and other characteristics which relate to air, water, and land
pollution and may require reporting for any such class or classes. Such
classifications and standards made pursuant to this section may be made
for application to the state as a whole or to any designated area of the
state and shall be made with special reference to effects on health,
economic and social factors, and physical effects on property. Such
standards and classifications may be amended as determined necessary by
the council.
(2) In adopting the classifications of waters and water quality
standards, the primary purpose for such classifications and standards
shall be to protect the public health and welfare and the council shall
give consideration to:
(a) The size, depth, surface area, or underground area covered, the
volume, direction, and rate of flow, stream gradient, and temperature of
the water;
(b) The character of the area affected by such classification or
standards, its peculiar suitability for particular purposes, conserving
the value of the area, and encouraging the most appropriate use of lands
within such area for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational,
and aquatic life purposes;
(c) The uses which have been made, are being made, or are likely to
be made, of such waters for agricultural, transportation, domestic, and
industrial consumption, for fishing and aquatic culture, for the disposal
of sewage, industrial waste, and other wastes, or other uses within this
state and, at the discretion of the council, any such uses in another
state on interstate waters flowing through or originating in this state;
(d) The extent of present pollution or contamination of such waters
which has already occurred or resulted from past discharges therein; and
(e) Procedures pursuant to section 401 of the Clean Water Act, as
-7-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., for certification by the department of
activities requiring a federal license or permit which may result in a
discharge.
(3) In adopting effluent limitations or prohibitions, the council
shall give consideration to the type, class, or category of discharges
and the quantities, rates, and concentrations of chemical, physical,
biological, and other constituents which are discharged from point
sources into navigable or other waters of the state, including schedules
of compliance, best practicable control technology, and best available
control technology.
(4) In adopting standards of performance, the council shall give
consideration to the discharge of pollutants which reflect the greatest
degree of effluent reduction which the council determines to be
achievable through application of the best available demonstrated control
technology, processes, operating methods, or other alternatives,
including, when practicable, a standard permitting no discharge of
pollutants.
(5) In adopting toxic pollutant standards and limitations, the
council shall give consideration to the combinations of pollutants, the
toxicity of the pollutant, its persistence, degradability, the usual or
potential presence of the affected organisms in any waters, the
importance of the affected organisms, and the nature and extent of the
effect of the toxic pollutant on such organisms.
(6) In adopting pretreatment standards, the council shall give
consideration to the prohibitions or limitations to noncompatible
pollutants, prohibitions against the passage through a publicly owned
treatment works of pollutants which would cause interference with or
obstruction to the operation of publicly owned treatment works, damage to
such works, and the prevention of the discharge of pollutants therefrom
which are inadequately treated.
(7) In adopting treatment standards, the council shall give
-8-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
consideration to providing for processes to which wastewater shall be
subjected in a publicly owned wastewater treatment works in order to make
such wastewater suitable for subsequent use.
(8) In adopting regulations pertaining to the disposal of domestic
and industrial liquid wastes, the council shall give consideration to the
minimum amount of biochemical oxygen demand, suspended solids, or
equivalent in the case of industrial wastewaters, which must be removed
from the wastewaters and the degree of disinfection necessary to meet
water quality standards with respect to construction, installation,
change of, alterations in, or additions to any wastewater treatment works
or disposal systems, including issuance of permits and proper
abandonment, and requirements necessary for proper operation and
maintenance thereof.
(9)(a) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for controlling mineral exploration holes and mineral production and
injection wells. The rules and regulations shall include standards for
the construction, operation, and abandonment of such holes and wells. The
standards shall protect the public health and welfare and air, land,
water, and subsurface resources so as to control, minimize, and eliminate
hazards to humans, animals, and the environment. Consideration shall be
given to:
(i) Area conditions such as suitability of location, geologic
formations, topography, industry, agriculture, population density,
wildlife, fish and other aquatic life, sites of archaeological and
historical importance, mineral, land, and water resources, and the
existing economic activities of the area including, but not limited to,
agriculture, recreation, tourism, and industry;
(ii) A site-specific evaluation of the geologic and hydrologic
suitability of the site and the injection, disposal, and production
zones;
(iii) The quality of the existing ground water, the effects of
-9-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
exemption of the aquifer from any existing water quality standards, and
requirements for restoration of the aquifer;
(iv) Standards for design and use of production facilities, which
shall include, but not be limited to, all wells, pumping equipment,
surface structures, and associated land required for operation of
injection or production wells; and
(v) Conditions required for closure, abandonment, or restoration of
mineral exploration holes, injection and production wells, and production
facilities in order to protect the public health and welfare and air,
land, water, and subsurface resources.
(b) The council shall establish fees for regulated activities and
facilities and for permits for such activities and facilities. The fees
shall be sufficient but shall not exceed the amount necessary to pay the
department for the direct and indirect costs of evaluating, processing,
and monitoring during and after operation of regulated facilities or
performance of regulated activities.
(c) With respect to mineral production wells, the council shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which require restoration of
air, land, water, and subsurface resources and require mineral production
well permit applications to include a restoration plan for the air, land,
water, and subsurface resources affected. Such rules and regulations may
provide for issuance of a research and development permit which
authorizes construction and operation of a pilot plant by the permittee
for the purpose of demonstrating the permittee's ability to inject and
restore in a manner which meets the standards required by this subsection
and the rules and regulations.
The rules and regulations adopted and promulgated may also provide
for issuance of a commercial permit after a finding by the department
that the injection and restoration procedures authorized by the research
and development permit have been successful in demonstrating the
applicant's ability to inject and restore in a manner which meets the
-10-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
standards required by this subsection and the rules and regulations.
(d) For the purpose of this subsection, unless the context otherwise
requires, restoration shall mean the employment, during and after an
activity, of procedures reasonably designed to control, minimize, and
eliminate hazards to humans, animals, and the environment, to protect the
public health and welfare and air, land, water, and subsurface resources,
and to return each resource to a quality of use consistent with the uses
for which the resource was suitable prior to the activity.
(10) In adopting livestock waste control regulations, the council
shall consider the discharge of livestock wastes into the waters of the
state or onto land not owned by the livestock operator, conditions under
which permits for such operations may be issued, including design,
location, and proper management of such facilities, protection of ground
water from such operations, and revocation, modification, or suspension
of such permits for cause and all requirements of the Livestock Waste
Management Act.
(11) In adopting regulations for the issuance of permits under the
National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System created by the Clean
Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., the council shall consider
when such permits shall be required and exemptions, application and
filing requirements, terms and conditions affecting such permits, notice
and public participation, duration and review of such permits, the
evaluation provided for under section 81-1517, and monitoring, recording,
and reporting under the system.
(12) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for air pollution control which shall include:
(a) A construction permit program which requires the owner or
operator of an air contaminant source to obtain a permit prior to
construction. Application fees shall be according to section 81-1505.06;
(b) An operating permit program consistent with requirements of the
Clean Air Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., and an operating
-11-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
permit program for minor sources of air pollution, which programs shall
require permits for both new and existing sources;
(c) Provisions for operating permits to be issued after public
notice, to be terminated, modified, or revoked for cause, and to be
modified to incorporate new requirements;
(d) Provisions for applications to be on forms provided by the
department and to contain information necessary to make a determination
on the appropriateness of issuance or denial. The department shall make a
completeness determination in a timely fashion and after such
determination shall act on the application within time limits set by the
council. Applications for operating permits shall include provisions for
certification of compliance by the applicant;
(e) Requirements for operating permits which may include such
conditions as necessary to protect public health and welfare, including,
but not limited to (i) monitoring and reporting requirements on all
sources subject to the permit, (ii) payment of annual fees sufficient to
pay the reasonable direct and indirect costs of developing and
administering the air quality permit program, (iii) retention of records,
(iv) compliance with all air quality standards, (v) a permit term of no
more than five years from date of issuance, (vi) any applicable schedule
of compliance leading to compliance with air quality regulations, (vii)
site access to the department for inspection of the facility and records,
(viii) emission limits or control technology requirements, (ix) periodic
compliance certification, and (x) other conditions necessary to carry out
the purposes of the Environmental Protection Act. For purposes of this
subsection, control technology shall mean a design, equipment, a work
practice, an operational standard which may include a requirement for
operator training or certification, or any combination thereof;
(f) Classification of air quality control regions;
(g) Standards for air quality that may be established based upon
protection of public health and welfare, emission limitations established
-12-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and maximum
achievable control technology standards for sources of toxic air
pollutants. For purposes of this subdivision, maximum achievable control
technology standards shall mean an emission limit or control technology
standard which requires the maximum degree of emission reduction that the
council, taking into consideration the cost of achieving such emission
reduction, any health and environmental impacts not related to air
quality, and energy requirements, determines is achievable for new or
existing sources in the category or subcategory to which the standard
applies through application of measures, processes, methods, systems, or
techniques, including, but not limited to, measures which accomplish one
or a combination of the following:
(i) Reduce the volume of or eliminate emissions of the pollutants
through process changes, substitution of materials, or other
modifications;
(ii) Enclose systems or processes to eliminate emissions; or
(iii) Collect, capture, or treat the pollutants when released from a
process, stack, storage, or fugitive emission point;
(h) Restrictions on open burning and fugitive emissions;
(i) Provisions for issuance of general operating permits, after
public notice, for sources with similar operating conditions and for
revoking such general authority to specific permittees;
(j) Provisions for implementation of any emissions trading programs
as defined by the department. Such programs shall be consistent with the
Clean Air Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., and administered
through the operating permit program;
(k) A provision that operating permits will not be issued if the
Environmental Protection Agency objects in a timely manner;
(l) Provisions for periodic reporting of emissions;
(m) Limitations on emissions from process operations, fuel-burning
equipment, and incinerator emissions and such other restrictions on
-13-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
emissions as are necessary to protect the public health and welfare;
(n) Time schedules for compliance;
(o) Requirements for owner or operator testing and monitoring of
emissions;
(p) Control technology requirements when it is not feasible to
prescribe or enforce an emission standard; and
(q) Procedures and definitions necessary to carry out payment of the
annual emission fee set in section 81-1505.04.
(13)(a) In adopting regulations for hazardous waste management, the
council shall give consideration to generation of hazardous wastes,
labeling practices, containers used, treatment, storage, collection,
transportation including a manifest system, processing, resource
recovery, and disposal of hazardous wastes. It shall consider the
permitting, licensing, design and construction, and development and
operational plans for hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal
facilities, and conditions for licensing or permitting of hazardous waste
treatment, storage, and disposal areas. It shall consider modification,
suspension, or revocation of such licenses and permits, including
requirements for waste analysis, site improvements, fire prevention,
safety, security, restricted access, and covering and handling of
hazardous liquids and materials. Licenses and permits for hazardous
waste, treatment, storage, and disposal facilities shall not be issued
until certification by the State Fire Marshal as to fire prevention and
fire safety has been received by the department. The council shall
further consider the need at treatment, storage, or disposal facilities
for required equipment, communications and alarms, personnel training,
and contingency plans for any emergencies that might arise and for a
coordinator during such emergencies.
In addition the council shall give consideration to (i) ground water
monitoring, (ii) use and management of containers and tanks, (iii)
surface impoundments, (iv) waste piles, (v) land treatment, (vi)
-14-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
incinerators, (vii) chemical or biological treatment, (viii) landfills
including the surveying thereof, and (ix) special requirements for
ignitable, reactive, or incompatible wastes.
In considering closure and postclosure of hazardous waste treatment,
storage, or disposal facilities, the council shall consider regulations
that would result in the owner or operator closing his or her facility so
as to minimize the need for future maintenance, and to control, minimize,
or eliminate, to the extent necessary to protect humans, animals, and the
environment, postclosure escape of hazardous waste, hazardous waste
constituents, and leachate to the ground water or surface waters, and to
control, minimize, or eliminate, to the extent necessary to protect
humans, animals, and the environment, waste decomposition to the
atmosphere. In considering corrective action for hazardous waste
treatment, storage, or disposal facilities, the council shall consider
regulations that would require the owner or operator, or any previous
owner or operator with actual knowledge of the presence of hazardous
waste at the facility, to undertake corrective action or such other
response measures necessary to protect human health or the environment
for all releases of hazardous waste or hazardous constituents from any
treatment, storage, or disposal facility or any solid waste management
unit at such facility regardless of the time at which waste was placed in
such unit.
Such regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall in all
respects comply with the Environmental Protection Act and the Resource
Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq.
(b) In adopting regulations for hazardous waste management, the
council shall consider, in addition to criteria in subdivision (a) of
this subsection, establishing criteria for (i) identifying hazardous
waste including extraction procedures, toxicity, persistence, and
degradability in nature, potential for accumulation in tissue,
flammability or ignitability, corrosiveness, reactivity, and generation
-15-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
of pressure through decomposition, heat, or other means, and other
hazardous characteristics, (ii) listing all materials it deems hazardous
and which should be subject to regulation, and (iii) locating treatment,
storage, or disposal facilities for such wastes. In adopting criteria for
flammability and ignitability of wastes pursuant to subdivision (b)(i) of
this subsection, no regulation shall be adopted without the approval of
the State Fire Marshal.
(c) In adopting regulations for hazardous waste management, the
council shall establish a schedule of fees to be paid to the director by
hazardous waste generators on the basis of an annual fee, the quantity of
hazardous waste generated by weight or volume as reported by the
generator to the national hazardous waste manifest system, or a
combination thereof; and by licensees or permittees operating hazardous
waste processing facilities or disposal areas on the basis of a monetary
value per cubic foot or per pound of the hazardous wastes. The fee
schedule shall be , sufficient but not exceeding the amount necessary for
to reimburse the department to pay for the direct and indirect costs of
the regulation of hazardous waste management for the costs of monitoring
such facilities or areas during and after operation of such facilities or
areas. The permittees licensees may assess a cost against persons using
the facilities or areas. The director shall remit any money collected
from fees paid to him or her to the State Treasurer who shall credit the
entire amount thereof to the Integrated Solid Waste Management Cash Fund
General Fund.
(d) In adopting regulations for solid waste disposal, the council
shall consider storage, collection, transportation, processing, resource
recovery, and disposal of solid waste, developmental and operational
plans for solid waste disposal areas, conditions for permitting of solid
waste disposal areas, modification, suspension, or revocation of such
permits, regulations of operations of disposal areas, including site
improvements, fire prevention, ground water protection, safety and
-16-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
restricted access, handling of liquid and hazardous materials, insect and
rodent control, salvage operations, and the methods of disposing of
accumulations of junk outside of solid waste disposal areas. Such
regulations shall in all respects comply with the Environmental
Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, and the
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et
seq.
(14) In adopting regulations governing discharges or emissions of
oil and other hazardous materials into the waters, in the air, or upon
the land of the state, the council shall consider the requirements of the
Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, methods for prevention of such
discharges or emissions, and the responsibility of the discharger or
emitter for cleanup, toxicity, degradability, and dispersal
characteristics of the substance.
(15) In adopting regulations governing composting and composting
sites, the council shall give consideration to:
(a) Approval of a proposed site by the local governing body,
including the zoning authority, if any, prior to issuance of a permit by
the department;
(b) Issuance of permits by the department for such composting
operations, with conditions if necessary;
(c) Submission of construction and operational plans by the
applicant for a permit to the department, with approval of such plans
before issuance of such permit;
(d) A term of up to ten years for such permits;
(e) Renewal of permits if the operation has been in substantial
compliance with composting regulations adopted pursuant to this
subsection, permit conditions, and operational plans;
(f) Review by the department of materials to be composted, including
chemical analysis when found by the department to be necessary;
(g) Inspections of such compost sites by the department. Operations
-17-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
out of compliance with composting regulations, permit conditions, or
operational plans shall be given a reasonable time for voluntary
compliance, and failure to do so within the specified time shall result
in a hearing after notice is given, at which time the owner or operator
shall appear and show cause why his or her permit should not be revoked;
(h) Special permits of the department for demonstration projects not
to exceed six months;
(i) Exemptions from permits of the department; and
(j) The Integrated Solid Waste Management Act.
(16) Any person operating or responsible for the operation of air,
water, or land contaminant sources of any class for which the rules and
regulations of the council require reporting shall make reports
containing information as may be required by the department concerning
quality and quantity of discharges and emissions, location, size, and
height of contaminant outlets, processes employed, fuels used, and the
nature and time periods or duration of discharges and emissions, and such
other information as is relevant to air, water, or land pollution and is
available.
(17) Prior to adopting, amending, or repealing standards and
classifications of air, water, and land quality and rules and regulations
under the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act or the Livestock Waste
Management Act, the council shall, after due notice, conduct public
hearings thereon. Notice of public hearings shall specify the waters or
the area of the state for which standards of air, water, or land are
sought to be adopted, amended, or repealed and the time, date, and place
of such hearing. Such hearing shall be held in the general area to be
affected by such standards. Such notice shall be given in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act.
(18) Standards of quality of the air, water, or land of the state
and rules and regulations adopted under the Integrated Solid Waste
Management Act or the Livestock Waste Management Act or any amendment or
-18-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
repeal of such standards or rules and regulations shall become effective
upon adoption by the council and filing in the office of the Secretary of
State. In adopting standards of air, water, and land quality or making
any amendment thereof, the council shall specify a reasonable time for
persons discharging wastes into the air, water, or land of the state to
comply with such standards and upon the expiration of any such period of
time may revoke or modify any permit previously issued which authorizes
the discharge of wastes into the air, water, or land of this state which
results in reducing the quality of such air, water, or land below the
standards established therefor by the council.
(19) All standards of quality of air, water, or land and all rules
and regulations adopted pursuant to law by the council prior to May 29,
1981, and applicable to specified air, water, or land are hereby approved
and adopted as standards of quality of and rules and regulations for such
air, water, or land.
(20) In addition to such standards as are heretofore authorized, the
council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to set standards
of performance, effluent standards, pretreatment standards, treatment
standards, toxic pollutant standards and limitations, effluent
limitations, effluent prohibitions, and quantitative limitations or
concentrations which shall in all respects conform with and meet the
requirements of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System in
the Clean Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.
(21)(a) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
requiring all new or renewal permit or license applicants regulated under
the Environmental Protection Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management
Act, or the Livestock Waste Management Act to establish proof of
financial responsibility by providing funds in the event of abandonment,
default, or other inability of the permittee or licensee to meet the
requirements of its permit or license or other conditions imposed by the
department pursuant to the acts. The council may exempt classes of
-19-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
permittees or licensees from the requirements of this subdivision when a
finding is made that such exemption will not result in a significant risk
to the public health and welfare.
(b) Proof of financial responsibility shall include any of the
following made payable to or held in trust for the benefit of the state
and approved by the department:
(i) A surety bond executed by the applicant and a corporate surety
licensed to do business in this state;
(ii) A deposit of cash, negotiable bonds of the United States or the
state, negotiable certificates of deposit, or an irrevocable letter of
credit of any bank or other savings institution organized or transacting
business in the United States in an amount or which has a market value
equal to or greater than the amount of the bonds required for the bonded
area under the same terms and conditions upon which surety bonds are
deposited;
(iii) An established escrow account; or
(iv) A bond of the applicant without separate surety upon a
satisfactory demonstration to the director that such applicant has the
financial means sufficient to self-bond pursuant to bonding requirements
adopted by the council consistent with the purposes of this subdivision.
(c) The director shall determine the amount of the bond, deposit, or
escrow account which shall be reasonable and sufficient so the department
may, if the permittee or licensee is unable or unwilling to do so and in
the event of forfeiture of the bond or other financial responsibility
methods, arrange to rectify any improper management technique committed
during the term of the permit or license and assure the performance of
duties and responsibilities required by the permit or license pursuant to
law, rules, and regulations.
(d) In determining the amount of the bond or other method of
financial responsibility, the director shall consider the requirements of
the permit or license or any conditions specified by the department, the
-20-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
probable difficulty of completing the requirements of such permit,
license, or conditions due to such factors as topography, geology of the
site, and hydrology, and the prior history of environmental activities of
the applicant.
This subsection shall apply to hazardous waste treatment, storage,
or disposal facilities which have received interim status.
(22)(a) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
no more stringent than the provisions of section 1453 et seq. of the
federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 300j-13 et seq.,
for public water system source water assessment programs.
(b) The council may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
implement a source water petition program no more stringent than section
1454 et seq. of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, 42
U.S.C. 300j-14 et seq.
(23) The council may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for
the issuance of permits relating to the discharge of dredged or fill
material into the waters of the United States under section 404 of the
Clean Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., giving consideration
to (a) when such permits are required and exemptions, application, and
filing requirements, (b) terms and conditions affecting such permits,
notice and public participation, and duration, (c) review of such
permits, (d) monitoring, recording, and reporting requirements, (e)
compensatory mitigation, and (f) such other requirements not inconsistent
with the Clean Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.
(24) The council may establish fees for applications,
determinations, permits, licenses, or similar authorizations for the
discharge of dredged and fill material under section 404 of the Clean
Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., to be collected by the
department. The fees shall be sufficient to pay the department for the
direct and indirect costs of administering a permitting program under
section 404 of the Clean Water Act.
-21-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
Sec. 5. (1) The Water Quality and Quantity Cash Fund is created.
The department shall remit all fees collected pursuant to this section
and money received by the department in the form of gifts, grants,
reimbursements, or monetary transfers from any source intended to be used
for the purposes of the fund to the State Treasurer for credit to the
fund. The fund shall be used to pay the reasonable direct and indirect
costs required to develop and administer programs to regulate discharges
under section 402 of the Clean Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. 1342 et
seq. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, each application for a National
Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or a pretreatment permit
required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to
subsection (20) of section 81-1505 shall be accompanied by an application
fee, to be determined by the department. The fee shall not be more than
the amount necessary to reimburse the department for administering the
applications. An application required under section 54-2428 shall be
exempt from the application fee required by this section.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2027, the department shall charge an annual
fee to each person who has a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination
System permit or who has a pretreatment permit required by rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to subsection (20) of
section 81-1505. The fee shall be an amount no more than the actual cost
of services provided. A permit issued pursuant to section 54-2428 shall
be exempt from the annual fee required by this section.
Sec. 6. Section 81-1532, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1532 Sections 81-1501 to 81-1532 and section 5 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Environmental Protection Act.
Sec. 7. Original sections 13-2041, 54-2428, 81-1505, and 81-1532,
-22-

LB761 LB761
2026 2026
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 46-606, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-23-